Nebraska, session 109, LB167.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 81-1566, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1566 The Nebraska Litter Reduction and Recycling Act shall terminate on
September 30, 2030 2025, unless extended by the Legislature. In order to
determine whether such extension shall occur, the department shall review and
evaluate the extent to which the purposes of the act have been and are being
achieved and the need for continuation of the program and requirements
established by the act. Such review and evaluation shall be completed at least
six months prior to the date established by this section for termination of the
act.
Sec. 2. Original section 81-1566, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is repealed.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-1-